epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/nl.xml
	<patterns>
		<!-- % The Plain TeX hyphenation tables [NOT TO BE CHANGED IN ANY WAY!] -->
		.a4
		.aan5
		.aarts5
		.aat5
		.ab5l
		.acht5end
		.ac5re
		.adi5
		.af3
		.af5l
		.af5s
		.aftu5re
		.al3ee
		.al3f
		.alk4
		.al5ko
		.alko5v
		.al5ma
		.al3om
		.al4st
		.ana3s
		.an3d2
		.an3en
		.an3gl
		.an5th
		.ar5d
		.ar5tr
		.as5h
		.as5l
		.as3t
		.as5tra
		.as3u
		.at4a
		.ave5n
		.b4
		.be3la
		.be5ra
		.be5ri
		.bos1
		.c4
		.coo5
		.co3ro
		.cus5
		.d4
		.daar5
		.da4gi
		.dag5r
		.da2k
		.dan2
		.debe4
		.de2k
		.dek5l
		.dek5s
		.den4k5r
		.de5od
		.de3ro
		.de5sta
		.di4a
		.die4p
		.di3o
		.doet3
		.do3v
		.du4w
		.e4
		.ede2
		.edel5a
		.ed3w
		.ee4n
		.eer5ste
		.eest3
		.eesto4
		.eet3
		.ei3l
		.ei5sc
		.ei3sp
		.ei5t
		.el4s5
		.en5s
		.en5th
		.ep4a
		.ere5s
		.er2f
		.erf3l
		.er3in
		.ert4
		.erts3
		.es3
		.es5c
		.es5pe
		.es5tr
		.eten4
		.et4h
		.ets5te.
		.eu3
		.eus5
		.é2
		.f4
		.fel4s
		.g4
		.gaat5
		.gang5s
		.gea5v
		.ge3l4a
		.ge5le
		.gelo5v
		.ge3n4a
		.gena5z
		.ge5ne
		.ge5no
		.ge3ra
		.ge5r4e
		.ge5r4o
		.gerst5a
		.ge3s
		.ge5sk
		.ge5ta
		.ge5tj
		.ge5to
		.gid4
		.go4m
		.goot3
		.h2
		.handels5
		.her5in
		.hits5t
		.ho4lo
		.houd5s
		.i4
		.ide5o
		.ij4s
		.ijs5l
		.ijs3p
		.ijs3t
		.ik3
		.in1
		.in5d4
		.in3g4
		.in5gr
		.ink2
		.in5kr
		.in5kw
		.in3s4
		.in5sl
		.in5st
		.in5ta
		.is5c
		.j4
		.jor5
		.k4
		.ka3d
		.ka5g
		.ka4taa
		.kerk5l
		.kerk5r
		.kerk5u
		.ker5sten
		.ke4s
		.koot5
		.ko5pe
		.kop5l
		.ko3v
		.kun2
		.l4
		.laat5ste
		.le4b5
		.leg3o
		.le4g3r
		.leid5st
		.len4s3
		.le5r4
		.le4s3
		.le5th
		.lin5d
		.lof5
		.loot3
		.lo4s1
		.lu3e
		.lui5t4j
		.lu4s
		.m4
		.ma5d
		.ma5ï
		.meel5d
		.me5la
		.me5ni
		.merk5l
		.me2s
		.me4st
		.met5ee
		.mij4n5i
		.moot3
		.mor5sten
		.mo4s
		.n4
		.naat5
		.na3d
		.na3n
		.na3s4
		.nee5s
		.ne2p
		.nep3a
		.ne4s
		.ne5te
		.ne4t3j
		.neu4t5j
		.nie4t5j
		.noot5
		.nos5t
		.no5v
		.o4
		.oe4r5
		.oe4s5
		.oeve4
		.ol3f
		.om1
		.omme3
		.on3a
		.on3d
		.onde4r
		.on1e
		.on5g
		.on3i
		.on5k
		.on1o
		.ono5v
		.on2t3
		.on4tee
		.on4ter
		.ont5s
		.ooi5tj
		.oot5jes
		.op5ee
		.opi5
		.op5l
		.op3r
		.op5s
		.org4
		.os5
		.ove4
		.p4
		.pee5tj
		.peri5
		.pers5te.
		.piet5j
		.pits5te.
		.poort5j
		.po4st
		.puit4
		.pui5tj
		.pu2t
		.r4
		.raads5le
		.ran4d
		.rand5a
		.re4men
		.ren4o
		.reno5v
		.re5o
		.rie4t3
		.rij5sp
		.ring5s4
		.roe5tj
		.ro4l
		.ro4st
		.ro4t3h
		.ro5v
		.s4
		.sap3
		.sa5v
		.sci3
		.see3
		.seks5te
		.se5re
		.set3
		.se5v
		.side3
		.ski3s4
		.sneu3
		.sno2
		.so2k3
		.song5
		.spoor5tj
		.st4
		.ste4m
		.t4
		.taart5j
		.tan4da
		.te4a
		.te4f
		.tek2
		.te3le
		.ten5ac
		.te3no
		.ten4t5j
		.te3ra
		.ter4p5a
		.ter5s
		.te4s
		.ti2n
		.tin3a
		.tin3e
		.toe5pr
		.to4lo
		.to4p
		.to5v
		.tri3s4
		.ts4
		.tsa3
		.tuit5j
		.ty2r
		.u4
		.ui2
		.ui5s
		.uit1
		.uit4je
		.uke5
		.ur4a
		.vaat5j
		.ven4t5j
		.ve4r3
		.ves5p
		.vet3j
		.vie4r
		.vol5s
		.w4
		.wals5te.
		.wee4ko
		.wee4t3
		.we4l3
		.wen4s5t
		.west5r
		.win4s
		.xe3
		.y2
		.z4
		.zes5
		.zit5
		.zooi5
		4a.
		a4a4
		4aad
		aad1a
		aad1o
		aad1r
		aad5sap
		aaf5a
		4aag
		aag1a
		aag3e
		aag3o
		aag5r
		aags4
		aag3sa
		aag5so
		aag3sp
		aai3l
		aak1a
		aak3e2
		aak1o
		aak5r
		aak3sp
		aal5a2
		aal1e
		aal5f4o
		aalfo5l
		aal1i
		aal5k
		aal5m
		aal1o2
		aal3sl
		aal5so
		aal5spe
		aal5ste
		aal1u
		aam1a
		aam3o
		aam4sta
		aam4ste
		aan1a
		5aandee
		aand4r
		aan1e2
		aan5g
		aan5i
		3aanj
		aan5k4
		3aann
		aan3o
		aan3sp
		aans4po
		aant4
		3aanta
		3aanv
		aap1a
		aap3i
		aap3o2
		aap3r
		aar3a
		aar4d5as
		aar3e4
		aar1i
		4aarn
		aar1o2
		aar5spel
		aar4t5on
		aarts5l
		aar3u
		aas3e
		aas3i
		4aast
		aas5tr
		aat3a
		aat5e
		aat3h
		aat3i
		aat1o
		aat5r
		abak4s5
		aba4l
		abat4s
		ab5eun
		ab3ijz
		a2bon
		aboot4j
		abot4j
		2abr
		ab3ru
		4ac.
		a3cal
		a3car
		4ace
		ace3st
		4ach.
		a3cha
		2a1che
		4a1chi
		ach3l
		a1cho
		a3chr
		4achs
		ach5tec
		a1chu
		achuut5
		4ack
		ac3kl
		2acl
		2a3co
		2acr
		ac5res
		4acta
		4acu
		4ad.
		a5da.
		ad3ac
		ada2d
		ada4l
		ada2r3
		adas5
		2add
		a5de.
		ad3ei
		ade5re
		a5des
		a3det
		a5deta
		ad3e4te
		2adh
		4ad4i
		adi3al
		adi4oc
		adi4od
		4adk
		2adl
		4ado.
		a3doo
		2adp
		ad3rei
		a3d4ri
		ad3rol
		2ads
		ad5se
		ad3so
		ad1s4t
		ad5sta
		ad3ui
		ad3w
		2ady
		4ae
		aege4
		ae5k4
		a3e2p
		ae3r
		ae2s3
		ae4s5t
		a3eu
		a2ë
		a4ër
		4afa
		af3aa
		a2f3ac
		af4as
		af4at
		afd4i
		afd2r
		af5d4w
		4afe
		afee4
		4afi
		af3l
		4afo
		a5fo.
		a2foe
		afon4d
		af3op
		af5org
		af1r
		af3s4
		afs2c
		af5se
		3afsl
		3afsp
		aft4a
		af5tr
		af3ui
		2afy
		4ag.
		ag1a2d
		ag3af
		ag3a2m
		ag3ar
		ag3di
		a5ge.
		agee5t
		4a5gen.
		ager4s
		ag3ex
		a4gil
		ag3ind
		a4g3ins
		agi5ot
		4ag1l
		ag3of
		a4g3or
		ag4o3v
		a2gr
		ag4ra
		ag5rap
		ag3ru
		ag3sl
		ag4sle
		ag5slu
		ags2p
		ag3spe
		ag3spi
		ag1st
		ag3sta
		ag5str
		2agt
		agu5a
		a2g3ui
		ag3u4r
		a2g3uu
		2ah
		4a1ha
		4a5he
		ahe5ri
		a1hi
		ah3l
		a3ho
		ah5r
		ah5t2
		a3hu
		a3hy
		ai5a2
		ai4dr
		ai1e
		a1ij
		ai5k
		ail3m
		ai2lo
		a2in
		aio4
		ai3ov
		ai3s4
		ai5sc
		ai4s5l
		ai5sn
		ai1so
		ai1st
		ai5tj
		ai3tr
		aiu4
		aïn4
		aïns5
		aïs3o4
		2a1j
		ajaars5
		aka2
		ak3af
		ak3ag
		a4k3ar
		a4k3ed
		ak3emi
		ake2t
		ak3id
		ak3ink
		ak5is
		1akko
		4a2k3l
		a2k3n
		ak5ne
		ak4ni
		a3kof
		ak3on
		ak3o2p
		a2kr
		ak5ru
		2aks
		ak4so
		ak5spe
		ak1st
		ak5to
		ak5t4w
		a2k3u4
		ak1w
		ak3wi
		a1la
		a4l3ach
		al3adr
		a3l4ag
		a3lal
		a5lapr
		al3art
		4ald
		a1le
		a5le.
		al3eff
		2aleg
		a2l3el
		ale5ro
		ale5ste
		ale4tj
		a3lè
		al4fen
		alf3l
		al5fon
		alfu4
		al2gl
		a3lie
		al3int
		alk5ei
		al5kle
		alk3s
		al4kui
		al5le
		al4mac
		al5me
		a1lo
		a4l3ol
		alo2n
		al3ou
		a4l3o4v
		2alp
		al3s4ag
		al3san
		al3scr
		als5j
		al2sl
		als5li
		als5m
		al4sn
		al4s3oo
		al4stem
		al5sten
		als5tou
		altaar5
		al3tha
		al4t3ro
		alt4st
		a1lu
		a2lui
		al3uit
		al3u4r
		alu2s5
		4am.
		a4m3ac
		am3adr
		ama4f
		4amag
		am3art
		5ambt
		ament4j
		ame4ran
		ame5tj
		a2meu
		am4i
		4amm
		am3oli
		a2m3o4v
		3ampè
		am2pl
		am4ple
		am4sm
		am4s3o
		am4spr
		ams5te.
		a2m3ui
		a3nad
		an3alg
		an4a3n
		an3arc
		2anc
		4anda
		anda4d
		and5ank
		an4d3e4d
		an4dex
		2andj
		an4dom
		an5d4ri
		and5roo
		ands5lo
		an4d3ul
		a4nem
		a3nen
		anen3i
		4aner
		an3est
		ane3us
		4ang.
		an4gan
		anga5p
		ange5st
		ang5le
		an2gr
		ang5sna
		angs4te
		aniet3
		anij4
		3anima
		an5ion
		a4n5isl
		ani5t
		4aniv
		4ank.
		an4kaa
		anka4n
		an4k3as
		an2k3j
		an4klu
		ank3of
		an2k3r
		a1no
		an3och
		a4n3oor
		an3ork
		ano3s
		ano3t4
		a4n3ou
		ano5v
		4ans
		an3san
		ans3cr
		an4seg
		an4serv
		an4sid
		an2so4
		ans5or
		ans3pi
		ans5pir
		an1st
		an4s5te.
		an5stru
		an4tac
		ante4n
		an3th
		2anti
		ant5sl
		ant3w
		4a1nu
		a5nuf
		an3ui
		an3ur
		an3uu
		anze5s
		2a1o
		ao4g
		ao2l
		a4om
		a2op2
		aor5t
		a3os
		aos3p
		aos5t
		4ap.
		a1pa
		a4pak
		a4pas
		ap3as.
		ap3ass
		a1pe
		ap5eten
		4a1pi
		apij4t5j
		ap3ijz
		ap1j
		2apl
		ap3le
		ap3li
		ap3lo
		a1plu
		apon5
		ap3oo
		apo3p
		apo5sta
		ap3o4v
		1appa
		4appen
		4apr
		ap3ra
		a3pre
		a4prem
		a5p4ris
		ap3ru
		ap2sa
		ap4si
		ap2s3l
		ap3sn
		ap4ste.
		2apt
		ap3tj
		2apu
		a2q
		4ar.
		a1ra
		araat5j
		a4r3app
		ara3s4
		ar2da
		ard3ac
		ard3ak
		ardo4
		ar4d3om
		ar4d3op
		ar4d3ov
		ar2d1r
		ar4dra
		ard3re
		ar4du
		ard3w
		a1re
		5a2rea
		a3reg
		a3rem
		ar4en
		are4no
		are3sp
		a3rev
		ar3gh
		ar2gl
		a1ri
		arie4tj
		arij3s
		ar3ins
		ark2
		ark3ac
		ar3k4l
		ar4map
		arm3u
		a1ro
		a2r3ob
		ar3oge
		a3rok
		aro4ko
		ar3oog
		a2r1o2p
		a3rot
		arpi4
		ar2s
		ar5sch
		ar3scr
		ars2e
		ar5see
		ar3si
		ars3l
		ar4sla
		ars5m
		ar3sni
		ar4so
		ar4sp
		ar5spo
		ars3ta
		ars5tal
		ar4s5tek
		ar4str
		ar4su
		art4aa
		ar4t3ak
		ar4tan
		art5ank
		ar4tap
		ar3tar
		4arte
		ar4tei
		ar2th
		ar5tij
		4ar4tj
		art5jesv
		4arto
		ar5tof
		art5o4ge
		art5oog
		ar4t3o4v
		ar2t3r
		ar4tro
		art5ru
		art4sl
		art5ste
		a3ru
		ar3ui
		4arw
		arwe3s
		a1ry
		4asa
		as3ad
		as4ag
		as3ak
		as1ap
		a2sc
		as5ce
		2ase
		a4sec
		a4s3eg
		aser5a
		ase5tj
		aseve4
		as5ha
		asis1
		a4sj
		as5ja
		as3ji
		as3k
		as5ka
		as5ki
		as3l
		as4lu
		as3m
		as5mi
		as3n
		as4ne
		as4ni
		4aso
		as3ob
		aso2l
		aso4r
		as1p
		as3pl
		a4s5q
		as5sa
		4assm
		3assu
		a2st
		4as3ta
		a4sta.
		as5tag
		as4tas
		as4tat
		as3te
		a3stek
		a3stem
		as5ten
		as3tè
		asting5sp
		as1to
		as3tob
		ast3op
		4astr
		ast5rem
		as5tro.
		as4tu
		a1t
		ataart5j
		at1ac
		at3ade
		at3af.
		at3ank
		ata3s
		2atek
		a5tell
		ate2n
		ate3no
		aten4t5r
		ater5ad
		ater5sl
		at4eu
		2atg
		at3hu
		ati5ni
		a2t3j
		at4je
		atjes5
		at5jesb
		at5jesh
		at5jesm
		at5jesp
		2atm
		2atn
		a2too
		at3oog
		atos5f
		ato3st
		at3rac
		at3rei
		at3rib
		at4roe
		at5ru
		at4s3a2
		at4s3ec
		atsi4
		at4s3id
		at2s3l
		at4slo
		ats5m
		ats3n
		at4sne
		ats3pr
		at2st
		at4staa
		at4s5tak
		at4ste.
		at5sten
		at5stij
		ats5tol
		ats5top.
		ats5trek
		at4t3u4
		a2t3ui
		at3w
		aua4
		au3ch
		au3co
		au5de
		aud4j
		1aug
		au3na
		aun3t
		aup2
		aur4
		au5re
		aure3u
		4aus
		au3so
		au4s5p
		au3sto
		au3t4
		4aut.
		1auto
		auto3p
		2auts3
		auw3a
		4auz
		a4ü
		avast4
		ave3c
		avee4
		ave4n3i
		aven5sp
		aver3a
		ave3re
		ave3r4u
		4avi
		a2vo
		1a4von
		a5voo
		a5vor
		4avy
		2a1w
		axis4
		ay2a
		4azif
		ä3h
		ämme3
		ä3r
		1b
		4b.
		3ba
		baar5ste
		baar5tj
		ba4da
		bad3ar
		ba4d3r
		bad3s
		ba3g4h
		ba3gl
		5b2ak
		ba4k3o4
		bak4sp
		ba3lan
		ba4lar
		bal3dw
		bale4
		bal3ev
		ba3lië
		bal4kl
		ba3lo
		bals4
		bal3sf
		ba4me
		ba5n2a
		ban4k3a
		ban4kl
		ban4k3o
		ban4kr
		bank3w
		ba3sa
		ba4st
		ba2tr
		ba3tro
		4bb
		bbe4l5ag
		bbe4l5ee
		bbe2n
		bben3a
		4b1c
		4b1d4
		b5de
		bdi5a
		3b4e
		be1a
		be3as
		be2au
		be3ch
		be5dwe
		be5dwi
		be5dwo
		bee4
		beet1
		be5g
		beie4
		bei3s
		bei5tj
		be5ki
		be3k4l
		be1kw
		be3lar
		be5l4as
		bel5dr
		be3le
		be4l3ec
		be4lex
		bel5f
		be3li
		be4l5int
		bel3k
		bel4o
		be3lo5v
		bel3sc
		bel3sp
		belt4
		bemen4s
		be3nep
		be5n4o
		be5ot
		be1ra
		bere5s4
		ber4g5af
		ber4g5et
		ber4gl
		ber4gr
		ber4i
		be1r4o
		bero5v
		be3ru
		be3ry
		be1s4
		bes5ac
		be4sh
		be4sje
		be3so
		be5sp
		bes5s
		bes5te.
		bes5ten.
		be5stie
		bet2
		be3t4h
		be5ton
		bet5ren
		be3tw
		be5twi
		be3und
		beur4s
		4b3f
		2b1g
		4b3h
		3b2i
		bid3s
		bi2du
		bie4li
		bi4en
		bie4t3j
		bij5d
		bij3f
		bij3g4
		bij5k4
		bij1p
		bij1s2
		bik4a
		5bil
		bi3lo
		bil3s2
		bin4dr
		bin4st
		bin4t3j
		bi5ob
		bi3ok
		bi5om
		bi3oso
		bi5ow
		bir3
		bi4st
		bis5troo
		bi1tr
		bit4se
		bit4s3p
		4b1j
		4b1k
		3b4l
		blad5ij
		2b5lap
		b5led
		bles3
		ble5spe
		ble2t3
		b5lid
		blijs4
		blij5ste
		bli2k
		4b5loi
		blok5l
		bloot5j
		blu2s
		2b1m
		4b1n
		b4o
		bo4d3ec
		body3
		boe4g3a
		boe4kn
		boe4ko
		boes4
		boe3st
		boet5st
		bo3f4l
		bo2k
		bok3an
		bokje5
		bok4st
		bolk4
		bo2m3a4
		bo2m3o
		bo5na
		bond2
		bond4s5
		3bone
		bo3no
		bon4t3j
		bon4t5o4
		boot3j
		boots5te.
		bo3p2
		bor4sta
		borst5o
		bor4st5r
		bo4s
		bos3a
		bo5sco
		bo5si
		bo5so
		bos5p
		bos5to
		bot3j
		bo4to
		bot3r
		bot4sp
		bot4st
		bo2tu
		bou5ta
		bouw5s
		bo3v
		bove4
		4b1p
		3br4
		braad5s
		bran4da
		bra5str
		brei5s4
		brie4t
		brie5tje.
		bri4l
		bro2n
		bron3o4
		bru2l
		4b1s4
		b2s5a
		b5sc
		b3si
		bsi3d
		bs5je
		b2s5la
		b2s5m
		bs5s
		b4stij
		4bt4
		b3ta
		b1tr
		bts5
		3b4u
		buit4j
		bul4k
		bu4lu
		bune5t
		b5urb
		bu5ri
		bus5c
		bus3o
		but4a
		but3j
		bu2to
		but4s
		buts5te
		buur4tj
		4bv
		2b3w
		by3
		4bz
		4c.
		1ca
		3ca.
		ca3b
		ca1ch
		5cada
		ca3do
		ca3dr
		cae3
		ca3g2
		cal4l3
		ca3lo
		came5r
		ca3na
		cant4
		ca2of
		ca1pr
		ca4pra
		ca5pri
		ca3ra
		car4u
		ca5se
		ca3s2p
		cas3t
		cas5tr
		ca3ta
		cate4n
		ca3t4h
		cau3
		cau4st
		ca3v
		2cb
		4c1c
		cca3
		cces5
		c4d
		c5do
		1ce
		3ced
		cee4
		3ceel
		3cel
		cel3d
		celes5
		ce5li
		cel5k
		ce4l3o
		2ce3n4a
		2cene
		ce3no
		5cent
		cen4t3j
		ceo4
		ce3ra
		cer2n
		ce5ro
		cer4t3r
		ce2s
		ce3s2a
		ce5sc
		ce3s2h
		ce3sta
		ce3s4ti
		cesu5r
